src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.aff
FLAG num
PFX 1637 Y 1
PFX 1637 0 noj .
SFX 1638 N 1
SFX 1638 ać za .
SFX 1639 N 1
SFX 1639 ać zcie .
SFX 1640 N 1
SFX 1640 ać zecie .
SFX 1641 N 1
SFX 1641 ać zesz .
SFX 1642 N 1
SFX 1642 ać ze .
SFX 1643 N 1
SFX 1643 ać zmy .
SFX 1644 N 1
SFX 1644 ać zōm .
SFX 1645 N 1
SFX 1645 ać zōncego .
SFX 1646 N 1
SFX 1646 ać zōnce .
SFX 1647 N 1
SFX 1647 ać zōnco .
SFX 1648 N 1
SFX 1648 ać zōncōm .
SFX 1649 N 1
SFX 1649 ać zōnc .
SFX 1650 N 1
SFX 1650 ać zōncych .
SFX 1651 N 1
SFX 1651 ać zōncyj .
SFX 1652 N 1
SFX 1652 ać zōncymi .
SFX 1653 N 1
SFX 1653 ać zōncymu .
SFX 1654 N 1
SFX 1654 ać zōncym .
SFX 1655 N 1
SFX 1655 ać zōncy .
SFX 1656 N 1
SFX 1656 ać z .
SFX 1657 N 1
SFX 1657 ać zymy .
SFX 1658 N 1
SFX 1658 oło ōł .
SFX 1659 N 1
SFX 1659 j ich .
SFX 1660 N 1
SFX 1660 j imi .
SFX 1661 N 1
SFX 1661 j im .
SFX 1662 N 1
SFX 1662 j i .
SFX 1663 N 1
SFX 1663 0 igo .
SFX 1664 N 1
SFX 1664 0 ij .
SFX 1665 N 1
SFX 1665 0 imu .
SFX 1666 N 1
SFX 1666 0 im .
SFX 1667 N 1
SFX 1667 ś aś .
SFX 1668 N 1
SFX 1668 ś eś .
SFX 1669 N 1
SFX 1669 ś ichś .
SFX 1670 N 1
SFX 1670 ś igoś .
SFX 1671 N 1
SFX 1671 ś ijś .
SFX 1672 N 1
SFX 1672 ś imś .
SFX 1673 N 1
SFX 1673 ś oś .
SFX 1674 N 1
SFX 1674 ś ōmś .
SFX 1675 N 1
SFX 1675 ś ymiś .
SFX 1676 N 1
SFX 1676 ś ymuś .
SFX 1677 N 1
SFX 1677 nsto ńścij .
SFX 1678 Y 1
SFX 1678 nsto ńścij .
PFX 1678 Y 1
PFX 1678 0 noj .
SFX 1679 N 1
SFX 1679 nsty ńściyjsi .
SFX 1680 N 1
SFX 1680 nsty ńściyjszego .
SFX 1681 N 1
SFX 1681 nsty ńściyjsze .
SFX 1682 N 1
SFX 1682 nsty ńściyjszo .
SFX 1683 N 1
SFX 1683 nsty ńściyjszōm .
SFX 1684 N 1
SFX 1684 nsty ńściyjszych .
SFX 1685 N 1
SFX 1685 nsty ńściyjszyj .
SFX 1686 N 1
SFX 1686 nsty ńściyjszymi .
SFX 1687 N 1
SFX 1687 nsty ńściyjszymu .
SFX 1688 N 1
SFX 1688 nsty ńściyjszym .
SFX 1689 N 1
SFX 1689 nsty ńściyjszy .
SFX 1690 Y 1
SFX 1690 nsty ńściyjsi .
PFX 1690 Y 1
PFX 1690 0 noj .
SFX 1691 Y 1
SFX 1691 nsty ńściyjszego .
PFX 1691 Y 1
PFX 1691 0 noj .
SFX 1692 Y 1
SFX 1692 nsty ńściyjsze .
PFX 1692 Y 1
PFX 1692 0 noj .
SFX 1693 Y 1
SFX 1693 nsty ńściyjszo .
PFX 1693 Y 1
PFX 1693 0 noj .
SFX 1694 Y 1
SFX 1694 nsty ńściyjszōm .
PFX 1694 Y 1
PFX 1694 0 noj .
SFX 1695 Y 1
SFX 1695 nsty ńściyjszych .
PFX 1695 Y 1
PFX 1695 0 noj .
SFX 1696 Y 1
SFX 1696 nsty ńściyjszyj .
PFX 1696 Y 1
PFX 1696 0 noj .
SFX 1697 Y 1
SFX 1697 nsty ńściyjszymi .
PFX 1697 Y 1
PFX 1697 0 noj .
SFX 1698 Y 1
SFX 1698 nsty ńściyjszymu .
PFX 1698 Y 1
PFX 1698 0 noj .
SFX 1699 Y 1
SFX 1699 nsty ńściyjszym .
PFX 1699 Y 1
PFX 1699 0 noj .
SFX 1700 Y 1
SFX 1700 nsty ńściyjszy .
PFX 1700 Y 1
PFX 1700 0 noj .
SFX 1701 N 1
SFX 1701 iyń niach .
SFX 1702 N 1
SFX 1702 iyń niami .
SFX 1703 N 1
SFX 1703 iyń nia .
SFX 1704 N 1
SFX 1704 iyń nie .
SFX 1705 N 1
SFX 1705 iyń niowi .
SFX 1706 N 1
SFX 1706 iyń niōm .
SFX 1707 N 1
SFX 1707 iyń niōw .
SFX 1708 N 1
SFX 1708 iyń niu .
SFX 1709 N 1
SFX 1709 iyń niym .
SFX 1710 N 1
SFX 1710 sto ścij .
SFX 1711 Y 1
SFX 1711 sto ścij .
PFX 1711 Y 1
PFX 1711 0 noj .
SFX 1712 N 1
SFX 1712 ć dzōm .
SFX 1713 N 1
SFX 1713 eki si .
SFX 1714 N 1
SFX 1714 eki szego .
SFX 1715 N 1
SFX 1715 eki sze .
SFX 1716 N 1
SFX 1716 eki szo .
SFX 1717 N 1
SFX 1717 eki szōm .
SFX 1718 N 1
SFX 1718 eki szych .
SFX 1719 N 1
SFX 1719 eki szyj .
SFX 1720 N 1
SFX 1720 eki szymi .
SFX 1721 N 1
SFX 1721 eki szymu .
SFX 1722 N 1
SFX 1722 eki szym .
SFX 1723 N 1
SFX 1723 eki szy .
SFX 1724 Y 1
SFX 1724 eki si .
PFX 1724 Y 1
PFX 1724 0 noj .
SFX 1725 Y 1
SFX 1725 eki szego .
PFX 1725 Y 1
PFX 1725 0 noj .
SFX 1726 Y 1
SFX 1726 eki sze .
PFX 1726 Y 1
PFX 1726 0 noj .
SFX 1727 Y 1
SFX 1727 eki szo .
PFX 1727 Y 1
PFX 1727 0 noj .
SFX 1728 Y 1
SFX 1728 eki szōm .
PFX 1728 Y 1
PFX 1728 0 noj .
SFX 1729 Y 1
SFX 1729 eki szych .
PFX 1729 Y 1
PFX 1729 0 noj .
SFX 1730 Y 1
SFX 1730 eki szyj .
PFX 1730 Y 1
PFX 1730 0 noj .
SFX 1731 Y 1
SFX 1731 eki szymi .
PFX 1731 Y 1
PFX 1731 0 noj .
SFX 1732 Y 1
SFX 1732 eki szymu .
PFX 1732 Y 1
PFX 1732 0 noj .
SFX 1733 Y 1
SFX 1733 eki szym .
PFX 1733 Y 1
PFX 1733 0 noj .
SFX 1734 Y 1
SFX 1734 eki szy .
PFX 1734 Y 1
PFX 1734 0 noj .
SFX 1735 N 1
SFX 1735 eko ij .
SFX 1736 Y 1
SFX 1736 eko ij .
PFX 1736 Y 1
PFX 1736 0 noj .
SFX 1737 N 1
SFX 1737 o ych .
SFX 1738 N 1
SFX 1738 o yj .
SFX 1739 N 1
SFX 1739 o ymi .
SFX 1740 N 1
SFX 1740 us ach .
SFX 1741 N 1
SFX 1741 us ami .
SFX 1742 N 1
SFX 1742 us a .
SFX 1743 N 1
SFX 1743 us owi .
SFX 1744 N 1
SFX 1744 us ōm .
SFX 1745 N 1
SFX 1745 us ōw .
SFX 1746 N 1
SFX 1746 us ym .
SFX 1747 N 1
SFX 1747 us y .
SFX 1748 N 1
SFX 1748 us ze .
SFX 1749 N 1
SFX 1749 i ego .
SFX 1750 N 1
SFX 1750 i ymi .
SFX 1751 N 1
SFX 1751 i ymu .
SFX 1752 N 1
SFX 1752 oł le .
SFX 1753 N 1
SFX 1753 oł łach .
SFX 1754 N 1
SFX 1754 oł łami .
SFX 1755 N 1
SFX 1755 oł ła .
SFX 1756 N 1
SFX 1756 oł łowi .
SFX 1757 N 1
SFX 1757 oł łōm .
SFX 1758 N 1
SFX 1758 oł łōw .
SFX 1759 N 1
SFX 1759 oł łym .
SFX 1760 N 1
SFX 1760 oł ły .
SFX 1761 N 1
SFX 1761 o ō .
SFX 1762 N 1
SFX 1762 rać iera .
SFX 1763 Y 1
SFX 1763 bry 0 .
PFX 1763 Y 1
PFX 1763 d lepszeg .
SFX 1764 Y 1
SFX 1764 bry 0 .
PFX 1764 Y 1
PFX 1764 d lepsz .
SFX 1765 Y 1
SFX 1765 0 ch .
PFX 1765 Y 1
PFX 1765 dobr lepsz .
SFX 1766 Y 1
SFX 1766 0 j .
PFX 1766 Y 1
PFX 1766 dobr lepsz .
SFX 1767 Y 1
SFX 1767 0 mi .
PFX 1767 Y 1
PFX 1767 dobr lepsz .
SFX 1768 Y 1
SFX 1768 0 mu .
PFX 1768 Y 1
PFX 1768 dobr lepsz .
SFX 1769 Y 1
SFX 1769 0 m .
PFX 1769 Y 1
PFX 1769 dobr lepsz .
PFX 1770 N 1
PFX 1770 dobr lepsz .
SFX 1771 Y 1
SFX 1771 bry jlepsi .
PFX 1771 Y 1
PFX 1771 d n .
SFX 1772 Y 1
SFX 1772 bry jlepszego .
PFX 1772 Y 1
PFX 1772 d n .
SFX 1773 Y 1
SFX 1773 bry jlepsze .
PFX 1773 Y 1
PFX 1773 d n .
SFX 1774 Y 1
SFX 1774 bry jlepszo .
PFX 1774 Y 1
PFX 1774 d n .
SFX 1775 Y 1
SFX 1775 bry jlepszōm .
PFX 1775 Y 1
PFX 1775 d n .
SFX 1776 Y 1
SFX 1776 bry jlepszych .
PFX 1776 Y 1
PFX 1776 d n .
SFX 1777 Y 1
SFX 1777 bry jlepszyj .
PFX 1777 Y 1
PFX 1777 d n .
SFX 1778 Y 1
SFX 1778 bry jlepszymi .
PFX 1778 Y 1
PFX 1778 d n .
SFX 1779 Y 1
SFX 1779 bry jlepszymu .
PFX 1779 Y 1
PFX 1779 d n .
SFX 1780 Y 1
SFX 1780 bry jlepszym .
PFX 1780 Y 1
PFX 1780 d n .
SFX 1781 Y 1
SFX 1781 bry jlepszy .
PFX 1781 Y 1
PFX 1781 d n .
SFX 1782 Y 1
SFX 1782 0 pij .
PFX 1782 Y 1
PFX 1782 dobrz l .
SFX 1783 Y 1
SFX 1783 brze jlepij .
PFX 1783 Y 1
PFX 1783 d n .
SFX 1784 N 1
SFX 1784 ōńć ynci .
SFX 1785 N 1
SFX 1785 ōńć yntego .
SFX 1786 N 1
SFX 1786 ōńć ynte .
SFX 1787 N 1
SFX 1787 ōńć ynto .
SFX 1788 N 1
SFX 1788 ōńć yntōm .
SFX 1789 N 1
SFX 1789 ōńć yntych .
SFX 1790 N 1
SFX 1790 ōńć yntyj .
SFX 1791 N 1
SFX 1791 ōńć yntymi .
SFX 1792 N 1
SFX 1792 ōńć yntymu .
SFX 1793 N 1
SFX 1793 ōńć yntym .
SFX 1794 N 1
SFX 1794 ōńć ynty .
SFX 1795 N 1
SFX 1795 ōńć yńciach .
SFX 1796 N 1
SFX 1796 ōńć yńciami .
SFX 1797 N 1
SFX 1797 ōńć yńcia .
SFX 1798 N 1
SFX 1798 ōńć yńcie .
SFX 1799 N 1
SFX 1799 ōńć yńcio .
SFX 1800 N 1
SFX 1800 ōńć yńciōm .
SFX 1801 N 1
SFX 1801 ōńć yńciu .
SFX 1802 N 1
SFX 1802 ōńć yńciym .
SFX 1803 N 1
SFX 1803 ōńć yńć .
SFX 1804 N 1
SFX 1804 ciōńć tna .
SFX 1805 Y 1
SFX 1805 ōńć e .
PFX 1805 Y 1
PFX 1805 d dotnie .
SFX 1806 N 1
SFX 1806 ciōńć tnieosz .
SFX 1807 N 1
SFX 1807 ciōńć tnieo .
SFX 1808 N 1
SFX 1808 ciōńć tnieōmy .
SFX 1809 N 1
SFX 1809 ciōńć tnijcie .
SFX 1810 N 1
SFX 1810 ciōńć tnijmy .
SFX 1811 N 1
SFX 1811 ciōńć tnij .
SFX 1812 N 1
SFX 1812 ciōńć tnōm .
SFX 1813 N 1
SFX 1813 ść bych .
SFX 1814 N 1
SFX 1814 ść byś .
SFX 1815 N 1
SFX 1815 ść by .
SFX 1816 N 1
SFX 1816 ć niōno .
SFX 1817 N 1
SFX 1817 ść 0 .
SFX 1818 N 1
SFX 1818 0 lichmy .
SFX 1819 N 1
SFX 1819 0 liście .
SFX 1820 N 1
SFX 1820 ś 0 .
SFX 1821 N 1
SFX 1821 c kbych .
SFX 1822 N 1
SFX 1822 c kbyś .
SFX 1823 N 1
SFX 1823 c kby .
SFX 1824 N 1
SFX 1824 c klibymy .
SFX 1825 N 1
SFX 1825 c klibyście .
SFX 1826 N 1
SFX 1826 c kliby .
SFX 1827 N 1
SFX 1827 c klichmy .
SFX 1828 N 1
SFX 1828 c klimy .
SFX 1829 N 1
SFX 1829 c kliście .
SFX 1830 N 1
SFX 1830 c kli .
SFX 1831 N 1
SFX 1831 c kłabych .
SFX 1832 N 1
SFX 1832 c kłabyś .
SFX 1833 N 1
SFX 1833 c kłaby .
SFX 1834 N 1
SFX 1834 c kłach .
