src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.dic
czerwōno/1636,1637
czoło/98,92,93,99,96,100,101,1658
czyj/1659,1660,1661,1662,3,108,1663,1664,1665,1666,442,6,444
czyjś/1667,1668,1669,1670,1671,1672,1673,1674,1675,1676
czynsto/1677,1678
czynsty/115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88,445,1679,1680,1681,1682,1683,1684,1685,1686,1687,1688,1689,1690,1691,1692,1693,1694,1695,1696,1697,1698,1699,1700
daleki/81,82,83,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,1713,1714,1715,1716,1717,1718,1719,1720,1721,1722,1723,1724,1725,1726,1727,1728,1729,1730,1731,1732,1733,1734
daleko/1735,1736
dinozaurus/1740,1741,1742,1743,1744,1745,1746,1747,1748
dioboł/1752,1753,1754,1755,1756,1757,1758,1759,1760
do/1761
dobry/115,116,117,118,119,83,85,86,87,88,1763,1764,1765,1766,1767,1768,1769,1770,1771,1772,1773,1774,1775,1776,1777,1778,1779,1780,1781
dobrze/1782,1783
dociōńć/954,955,956,957,958,959,960,961,962,963,964,965,966,967,968,969,970,971,972,973,974,975,976,977,978,979,980,981,1784,1785,1786,1787,1788,1789,1790,1791,1792,1793,1794,1795,1796,1797,1798,1799,1800,1801,1802,1803,1804,1805,1806,1807,1808,1809,1810,1811,1812
gynsto/1710,1711
isto/1710,3238
koło/98,92,93,99,96,100,101,1658
lipiyń/1701,1702,1703,1704,1705,1706,1707,1708,1709
niczyj/1659,1660,1661,1662,3,108,1663,1664,1665,1666,442,6,444
pisać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,1638,1639,1640,1641,1642,1643,1644,1645,1646,1647,1648,1649,1650,1651,1652,1653,1654,1655,1656,1657
prosto/1711,1710
rozdać/1712,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,422,423,424,425,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,426,427,428,429
siyrpiyń/1701,1702,1703,1704,1705,1706,1707,1708,1709
taki/81,82,83,84,85,86,88,89,90,1751
to/99,5189,94,96,1737,1738,1739,5190,101,5191
tusto/1711,1710
ujno/94,96,1737,1738,1739,101
uściść/1813,1814,1815,1470,1471,1472,1473,1474,1475,1476,1477,1478,1479,1480,1481,1482,1483,1484,1485,1486,1487,1488,1500,279,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,395,1502,1503,39,1816,1507,1508,1509,1510,1511,1512,1513,1514,1515,1516,1517,1518,1519,1520,1521,1522,1523,1524,1525,1526,288,1817
wepisać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,1638,1639,1640,1641,1642,1643,1644,1656,1657
wszeli/2850,2851,2852,2853,2854,2855,2856,2857,2858,2859,2860,1749,82,83,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,2839,2840,2841,2842,2843,2844,2845,2846,2847,2848,2849,1750,1751
wynzoł/5592,5593,5594,5595,5596,1755,1756,1759,5597
zaciōńć/954,955,956,957,958,959,960,961,962,963,964,965,966,967,968,969,970,971,972,973,5277,974,975,976,977,978,979,980,981,1784,1785,1786,1787,1788,1789,1790,1791,1792,1793,1794,1795,1796,1797,1798,1799,1800,1801,1802,1803,1804,3886,1806,1807,1808,1809,1810,1811,1812
zawziōńć/4798,4799,4800,4801,4802,4803,4804,4805,4806,954,955,956,957,958,959,960,961,962,963,964,965,966,967,968,969,970,971,972,973,5277,974,975,976,977,978,979,980,981,4807,4808,4809,4810,4811,4812,4813,1784,4814,4815,1785,1786,1787,1788,1789,1790,1791,1792,1793,1794
ôbciōńć/954,955,956,957,958,959,960,961,962,963,964,965,966,967,968,969,970,971,972,973,974,975,976,977,978,979,980,981,1784,1785,1786,1787,1788,1789,1790,1791,1792,1793,1794,1795,1796,1797,1798,1799,1800,1801,1802,1803,1804,3886,1806,1807,1808,1809,1810,1811,1812
ôdebrać/1762,909,910,911,912,913,914,926,927,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,54,55,56,57,58,59,60
ôdjōńć/3940,3941,3942,3943,3944,3945,3946,3947,3948,954,955,956,957,958,959,960,961,962,963,964,965,966,967,968,969,970,971,972,973,974,975,976,977,978,979,980,981,1784,1785,1786,1787,1788,1789,1790,1791,1792,1793,1794,1795,1796,1797,1798,1799,1800,1801,1802,1803
ôpisać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,1638,1639,1640,1641,1642,1643,1644,1656,1657
